Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 16. WINERY PERMIT

Sec. 16.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. (a) Except as provided by Section 16.011, the holder of a winery permit may:

(1) manufacture, bottle, label, and package wine containing not more than 24 percent alcohol by volume;

(2) manufacture fruit brandy and:

(A) use that brandy on the winery permit holder's permitted premises for fortifying purposes only; or

(B) sell that brandy to other winery permit holders;

(3) import or buy fruit brandy from a permit holder authorized to manufacture fruit brandy and use that brandy on the winery permit holder's permitted premises for fortifying purposes only;

(4) sell wine in this state to or buy wine from permit holders authorized to purchase and sell wine, including holders of wholesaler's permits and winery permits;

(5) sell wine to ultimate consumers:

(A) for consumption on the winery premises; or

(B) in unbroken packages for off-premises consumption in an amount not to exceed 35,000 gallons annually;

(6) sell the wine outside this state to qualified persons;

(7) blend wines;

(8) dispense free wine for consumption on the winery premises; and

(9) purchase and import wine from the holder of a nonresident seller's permit.

(b) The holder of a winery permit may manufacture and label wine for an adult in an amount not to exceed 50 gallons annually for the personal use of the adult. Any amount of wine produced under this subsection is included in the annual total amount that may be sold by the holder under Subsection (a)(5). An adult for whom wine is manufactured and labeled under this subsection is not required to hold a license or permit issued under this code.

(c) The holder of a winery permit may conduct wine samplings, including wine tastings at a retailer's premises. A winery employee may open, touch, or pour wine, make a presentation, or answer questions at a wine sampling.

Without reference to the amendment of subsec. (d) by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1051, Sec. 1, Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1119, Sec. 3 repealed subsec. (d)

(d) The holder of a winery permit may sell wine to ultimate consumers for consumption on or off winery premises and dispense free wine for consumption on or off the winery premises.

(e) The holder of a winery permit may dispense wine for consumption on the premises of the winery under Section 16.07.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 416, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2116, ch. 819, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2212, ch. 515, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 998, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1257, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1051, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1119, Sec. 1, 3, eff. Sept. 13, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 275 (S.B. 529), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1190 (S.B. 1090), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 66, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 16.011. PREMISES IN DRY AREA. A winery permit may be issued for premises in an area in which the sale of wine has not been authorized by a local option election. A holder of a permit under this section may engage in any activity authorized under Section 16.01 except that the permit holder may sell or dispense wine under that section only if the wine is:

(1) bottled in this state; and

(2) at least 75 percent by volume fermented juice of grapes or other fruit grown in this state or a lesser percentage established by the commissioner of agriculture under Section 12.039, Agriculture Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1119, Sec. 2., eff. Sept. 13, 2003

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 878 (S.B. 1137), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 16.03. IMPORTATION FOR BLENDING. The holder of a winery permit may, for blending purposes, import wines or grape brandy. The wine or grape brandy may be purchased only from the holders of nonresident seller's permits. The state tax on wines imported for blending purposes does not accrue until the wine has been used for blending purposes and the resultant product placed in containers for sale.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 416, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2116, ch. 819, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1190 (S.B. 1090), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 16.04. FEDERAL PERMIT REQUIRED. A winery permit may be granted only on presentation of an appropriate federal wine permit.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 416, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2116, ch. 819, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 67, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 16.05. OPERATING AGREEMENTS BETWEEN PERMIT HOLDERS. (a) The holder of a winery permit may engage in any activity authorized by that permit on the permitted premises of another winery permit holder under an agreement between the permit holders that is approved by the commission and that describes with specificity the nature, duration, and extent of the activities authorized by the agreement.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules regulating the shared use of winery premises under this section to ensure administrative accountability of each permit holder and a strict separation between the businesses and operations of the permit holders.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 878 (S.B. 1137), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 16.06. PARTICIPATION IN CERTAIN OFF-PREMISES WINE EVALUATION ACTIVITIES. (a) For the purpose of participating in an organized wine tasting, wine evaluation, wine competition, or literary review, the holder of a winery permit may deliver wine produced and manufactured by the holder to locations that are not licensed under this code for the purpose of submitting the wine to an evaluation at an organized wine tasting competition attended primarily by unlicensed persons or by a wine reviewer whose reviews are published if:

(1) no charge of any kind is made for the wine, delivery, or attendance at the event; and

(2) the commission consents in writing to the delivery.

(b) In connection with events authorized by Subsection (a) of this section, the holder of the winery permit may dispense wine to individuals attending the event and discuss with them the manufacture and characteristics of the wine.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 142, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 3.001, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 16.07. WINE SAMPLING. (a) The holder of a winery permit may conduct wine samplings, including wine tastings, on the permitted premises. The holder of the permit may collect a fee for the wine sampling.

(b) A sampling event authorized by this section may not be advertised except by on-site communication or by direct mail.

(c) A person other than the holder of a permit or the holder's agent or employee may not dispense or participate in the dispensing of wine under this section.

(d) A person authorized to dispense wine under this section:

(1) may serve a person more than one sample; and

(2) may not serve a sample to a minor or to an obviously intoxicated person.

(e) A person who receives a sample may not remove the sample from the permitted premises.

(f) For the purposes of this code and any other law of this state or a political subdivision of this state, the holder of a permit, during the sampling of wine under this section, is:

(1) not the holder of a permit authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption; and

(2) not considered to have received any revenue from the on-premises sale of alcoholic beverages.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 998, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 16.08. WINE FESTIVALS. (a) At an event that is approved by the commission, organized to celebrate and promote the wine industry in this state, and held in whole or in part on the premises of the holder of a winery permit, the permit holder may:

(1) sell wine to consumers for consumption on or off the holder's premises; and

(2) dispense wine without charge for consumption on or off the holder's premises.

(b) The holder of a winery permit may sell wine to the holder of a wine and malt beverage retailer's permit, mixed beverage permit, private club permit, or nonprofit entity temporary event permit for an event that is approved by the commission and organized to celebrate and promote the wine industry in this state.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 878, Sec. 10(1), eff. June 17, 2005.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1001, Sec. 2.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 878 (S.B. 1137), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 68, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 16.09. DIRECT SHIPMENT TO CONSUMERS. (a) The holder of a winery permit may ship wine to the ultimate consumer, including ultimate consumers located in dry areas. Delivery must be by the holder of a carrier permit.

(b) All wine shipped to an ultimate consumer by the holder of a winery permit must be in a package that is clearly and conspicuously labeled showing that:

(1) the package contains wine; and

(2) the package may be delivered only to a person described in Subsection (c).

(c) Wine shipped by the holder of a winery permit may not be delivered to any person other than:

(1) the person who purchased the wine;

(2) a recipient designated in advance by such purchaser; or

(3) a person at the delivery address who is age 21 or over.

(d) Wine may be delivered only to a person who is age 21 or over after the person accepting the package:

(1) presents valid proof of identity and age; and

(2) personally signs a receipt acknowledging delivery of the package.

(e) The holder of a winery permit may not:

(1) sell or ship wine to a minor;

(2) deliver wine to a consumer using a carrier that does not hold a carrier's permit under this code; or

(3) deliver to the same consumer in this state more than nine gallons of wine within any calendar month or more than 36 gallons of wine within any 12-month period.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 36 (S.B. 877), Sec. 1, eff. May 9, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 346 (H.B. 1084), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 16.10. TRANSPORTING WINE. (a) The holder of a winery permit may transport wine, if the transportation is for a lawful purpose, from:

(1) the place of purchase to the holder's place of business; and

(2) the place of sale or distribution to the purchaser.

(b) The holder of a winery permit may transport wine from one wet area to another wet area across a dry area if that course of transportation is necessary or convenient.

(c) The holder of a winery permit may transport wine only in a vehicle that is owned or leased in good faith by the permit holder or by the permit holder's agent.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 69, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 16.11. STORAGE. (a) The holder of a winery permit may store wine:

(1) on the permit holder's premises; or

(2) inside or outside the county in which the permit holder's business is located in a:

(A) public bonded warehouse that is authorized to store liquor under Chapter 46; or

(B) private warehouse that is:

(i) owned or leased by the permit holder; and

(ii) operated by the permit holder.

(b) The holder of a winery permit whose winery is located in a county all or part of which is in a dry area may store the winery's product in a dry area of that county if the product to be stored is owned by the permit holder and remains in the permit holder's possession.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 70, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 16.12. SALES AT TEMPORARY LOCATION. (a) The holder of a winery permit may sell wine at a civic or wine festival, farmers' market, celebration, or similar event.

(b) The holder of a winery permit may not offer wine for sale under this section on more than four consecutive days at the same location.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:

(1) require the permit holder to notify the commission of the dates on which and location where the permit holder will temporarily offer wine for sale under this section;

(2) establish a procedure to verify the wet or dry status of the location where the permit holder intends to temporarily sell wine under this section;

(3) detail the circumstances when a permit holder may temporarily sell wine under this section with just a notification to the commission and the circumstances that require the commission's preapproval before a permit holder may temporarily sell wine under this section; and

(4) require the permit holder to provide any other information the commission determines necessary.

(d) The provisions of this code applicable to the sale of wine on the permitted premises of the holder of a winery permit apply to the sale of wine under this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 71, eff. September 1, 2021.